Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 2. Agricultural Cooperative Associations.

§ 13.1-312.
Declaration of policy.

It is the declared policy of the Commonwealth, as one means of improving the economic position of agriculture, to encourage the organization of producers of agricultural products into effective nonprofit cooperative associations under the control of such producers, and to that end this Act shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes.

History.

1956, c. 428; 2022, c. 234.

Editor’s note.

This section, relating to the declaration of policy with regard to Agricultural Cooperative Associations, was enacted by Acts 1956, c. 428. In furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application, this section, which is limited in its purpose and scope, is not set out here, but attention is called to it by this reference.

The section catchline was inserted at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 234 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this State” and “shall” for “should”; added “to accomplish its purposes”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-313.
Definitions.

As used in this Act, unless the context or subject matter requires otherwise:

“Agricultural products” include livestock and livestock products, dairy products, poultry and poultry products, wine and viticultural products, seeds, nuts, ground stock, horticultural, floricultural, forestry, bee and any and all kinds of farm products.

“Supplies” include any and all types of supplies, machinery and equipment used by farmers as producers or used by farmers as consumers.

“Association” means a corporation organized under or adopting the provisions of this Act, or a foreign association or corporation authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, organized under any general or special act as a cooperative association for the mutual benefit of its members and other patrons as farmers, and which confines its operations to purposes authorized by this Act and restricts the return on the stock or membership capital and the amount of its business with nonmembers to the limits placed thereon by this Act for associations organized hereunder and which qualifies to do business in this Commonwealth under this Act.

Associations shall be classified as and deemed to be nonprofit corporations, inasmuch as their primary object is not to pay dividends on invested capital, but to render service and provide means and facilities by or through which the producers of agricultural products may receive a reasonable and fair return for their products and obtain supplies and services on a cooperative nonprofit basis.

“This Act” means this article, which may be cited as the “Agricultural Cooperative Association Act.”

“Member” includes the holder of a membership in an association without capital stock and the holder of voting stock in an association organized with capital stock.

“Person” includes an individual, a partnership, a corporation and an association.

“Patron” means a person using the marketing facilities of an association for the marketing of agricultural products, or a person using the purchasing or service facilities of an association for the purchase of supplies or the rendering of services.

“Board” means the board of directors of an association.

“Commission” means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-248; 1956, c. 428; 2010, cc. 317, 561.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 317 and 561 are identical, and in the definition of “agricultural products,” inserted “wine and viticultural products” and deleted “viticultural” following “floricultural.”

§ 13.1-314.
Qualification of incorporators.

Five or more individuals, engaged in agriculture as bona fide producers of agricultural products, or two or more associations of such producers, may form an association.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-315.
Purposes.

Such association may be organized for the purpose of engaging in any cooperative activity for producers of agricultural products in connection with:

Producing, assembling, marketing, buying or selling agricultural products, or harvesting, preserving, drying, processing, manufacturing, blending, canning, packing, ginning, grading, storing, warehousing, handling, transporting, shipping or utilizing such products, or manufacturing or marketing the by-products thereof.

Manufacturing, processing, storing, transporting, delivering, handling, buying for or furnishing supplies to its members and other patrons.

Performing or furnishing business or educational or other services, including the services of buildings, machinery and equipment, on a cooperative basis.

Financing any of the above-enumerated activities for its members.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-255; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-316.
Articles of incorporation.

Articles of incorporation shall be signed in triplicate by each of the incorporators and acknowledged by them, if natural persons, and, if associations, by the president and secretary of each such association, before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments, and shall state:

The name of the association which shall be distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from the name of any association or corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, limited liability company, business trust or limited partnership existing under the laws of this Commonwealth, or the name of any foreign corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, limited liability company, business trust or limited partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth, or any corporate, limited liability company, business trust or limited partnership name reserved or registered as provided by law;

The address of its initial registered office (including both (i) the post-office address with street and number, if any, and (ii) the name of the county or city in which it is located) and the name of its initial registered agent at such address and that the agent is either (i) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either a director of the corporation or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (ii) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth;

Its purposes;

Whether organized with or without capital stock; and if organized with capital stock, a description thereof in accordance with the requirements of §

13.1-619

;

If organized without capital stock, whether the property rights and interests of each member are equal or unequal; if unequal, the rule by which such rights and interests shall be determined;

The maximum number of directors, not less than five, who are to manage the affairs of the association;

The number of directors constituting the initial board of directors and the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as the initial directors;

If the duration of a corporation is not to be perpetual, the period of its duration;

The articles may also contain any other provisions, consistent with law for regulating the association’s business or the conduct of its affairs, the establishment of election districts, the election of delegates to represent the members residing therein and the election of directors to represent such election districts, either directly or indirectly by said delegates, for voting by proxy or mail ballot and the issuance, retirement and transfer of membership certificates and stock.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-257; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2003, c. 592.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subsection (b), substituted “the agent is either (i) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either a director” for “he is a resident of Virginia and that he is a director” and added “or (ii) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, in subsection A, substituted “be distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from” for “not be the same as, or confusingly similar to,” and inserted “limited liability company, business trust or limited partnership” in three places.

§ 13.1-317.
Filing and recording articles of incorporation.

Triplicate originals of the articles of incorporation, duly signed and acknowledged together with the filing fee required to be paid, shall be delivered to the Commission. If the Commission finds that the articles comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall by order issue a certificate of incorporation, which shall be admitted to record in its office. Upon the issuance of such certificate, it shall become effective in accordance with its terms. One original counterpart of the articles of incorporation, together with the certificate of incorporation issued by the Commission, shall be certified by the Commission to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services for filing and another counterpart shall be certified to the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Division for filing.

For filing and recording the certificate of incorporation, an amendment to the certificate of incorporation, or a certificate of adoption, the association shall pay such fees as conform to the laws governing corporations generally. However, for filing the certificate of incorporation of an association organized without capital stock, the association shall pay ten dollars and for filing an amendment to the certificate of incorporation, two dollars and one-half. For certifying and transmitting copies as required by this section, the association shall pay a fee of one dollar per copy.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-318.
Amendments to the articles of incorporation.

An association may amend its articles of incorporation by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members voting thereon at any regular meeting, or at a special meeting called for the purpose. Notice of the proposed amendment and of the time and place of holding such meetings shall be delivered to each member, or mailed to his last known address shown by the books of the association, at least ten days prior to any such meetings. No amendment affecting the priority or preferential rights of any outstanding nonvoting stock shall be adopted until the written consent of two-thirds of the holders of such outstanding nonvoting stock has been obtained. Triplicate originals of the articles of amendment duly signed and acknowledged together with the filing fee required to be paid shall be delivered to the Commission. If the Commission finds that the articles comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall by order issue a certificate of amendment, which shall be admitted to record in its office. Upon the issuance of such certificate, it shall become effective in accordance with its terms. One original counterpart of the articles of amendment, together with the certificate of amendment issued by the Commission, shall be certified by the Commission to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services for filing and another counterpart shall be certified to the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Division for filing.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-258; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-319.
Bylaws.

The board of directors or members of the association, before commencing business, shall adopt bylaws not inconsistent with law or its articles of incorporation, and they may alter, amend and revise the same from time to time. The bylaws may be adopted, amended or revised by a majority vote of the board of directors, or by the vote of two-thirds of the members voting thereon at any regular or special meeting of the members or by the written assent of two-thirds of the members voting thereon by mail ballot, provided, that written notice of the proposed bylaw or bylaw amendments or revisions shall have been delivered to each member or mailed to his last known address as shown by the books of the association, at least ten days prior to any such meeting or the date on which the mail ballots must be returned to be counted. The bylaws made by the board of directors may be repealed or changed and new bylaws made by the members, and the members may prescribe that any bylaw made by them shall not be altered, amended or repealed by the directors. The bylaws may also provide for any or all of the following matters:

The time, place and manner of calling and conducting meetings of the members, and the number of members (which may be less than a majority) that shall constitute a quorum;

The manner of voting and the conditions upon which members may vote at general and special meetings by proxy and by mail or by delegates elected by district groups or other associations;

Subject to any provision thereon in the articles of incorporation and in this Act, the number, qualifications, compensation, duties and terms of office of directors and officers; the time of their election and the mode and manner of giving notice thereof;

The time, place and manner for calling and holding meetings of the directors and executive committee, and the number that shall constitute a quorum;

Rules consistent with law and the articles of incorporation for the management of the association, the establishment of election districts, the making of contracts, the issuance, retirement and transfer of stock, the relative rights, interests and preferences of members and stockholders, and the mode, manner and effect of the expulsion of a member;

Penalties for violations of the bylaws.

One copy of the bylaws and all amendments thereto, certified by the secretary of the association, shall be transmitted to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services and one copy to the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Division within thirty days after their adoption.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-261; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-320.
Powers.

An association shall have the capacity to act possessed by natural persons, but such association shall have authority to perform only such acts as are necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes as set forth in its articles of incorporation and which are not repugnant to law.

Without limiting or enlarging the grant of authority contained in subsection A of this section, it is hereby specifically provided that every such association shall have authority:

To act as agent, broker or attorney-in-fact for its members, and for any subsidiary or affiliated association, and otherwise to assist or join with associations engaged in any one or more of the activities authorized by its articles of incorporation, and to hold title for its members and for subsidiary and affiliated associations to property handled or managed by the association on their behalf.

To make contracts, and to exercise by its board or duly authorized officers or agents, all such incidental powers as may be necessary, suitable or proper for the accomplishment of the purposes of the association and not inconsistent with law or its articles of incorporation and that may be conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association.

To make loans or advances to members or producer-patrons or to the members of an association which is itself a member or subsidiary thereof; to purchase, or otherwise acquire, endorse, discount or sell any evidence of debt, obligation or security.

To establish and accumulate reserves and surplus to capital, and such other funds as may be authorized by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

To own and hold membership in, or shares of the capital stock of, other associations and corporations and the bonds or other obligations thereof, engaged in any related activity, in producing, warehousing or marketing any of the products handled by the association or in financing its activities or of its members, and while the owner thereof, to exercise all the rights of ownership, including the right to vote thereon.

If such associations are warehousing corporations, they may issue legal warehouse receipts to the association, or to any other person, and such legal warehouse receipts shall be considered as adequate collateral to the extent of the current value of the commodity represented thereby. In case such warehouse is licensed or licensed and bonded under the laws of this Commonwealth or the United States, its warehouse receipt shall not be challenged or discriminated against because of ownership or control, wholly or in part, by the associations.

To acquire, hold, sell, dispose of, pledge or mortgage any property which its purposes may require, subject to any limitation prescribed by law or its articles of incorporation.

To borrow money and to give its notes, bonds or other obligations therefor and secure the payment thereof in any manner consistent with law.

To purchase or otherwise handle machinery, equipment, supplies and perform services for nonmembers.

To market or otherwise deal in products of nonmembers to an amount not greater in annual value than such products as are dealt in for or on behalf of its members.

To have a corporate seal and to alter the same at pleasure.

To continue as a corporation for the time limited in its articles of incorporation, or if no time limit is specified, then perpetually.

To sue and to be sued in its corporate name.

To conduct business in this Commonwealth and elsewhere.

To dissolve and wind up.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-260; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 220; 1989, c. 576.

§ 13.1-321.
Members.

An association may admit as members only bona fide producers of agricultural products, including tenants and landlords receiving a share of the crop, and cooperative associations of such producers.

The articles of incorporation may limit the amount of voting stock which a member may own.

Under the terms and conditions prescribed in the bylaws a member shall lose his membership and his right to vote if he ceases to belong to the class eligible to membership under this section, but he shall remain subject to any liability incurred by him while a member of the association.

No member shall be personally liable for any debt or liability of the association.

No member shall have more than one vote.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-263; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-322.
Membership or voting stock certificates; transfers; dividends; nonvoting stock.

No certificate for membership or stock shall be issued until fully paid for, but promissory notes may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment. The association shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but such retention as security shall not affect the member’s right to vote and hold office.Fractional shares may be issued by capital stock associations. Certificates representing shares and certificates of membership or other evidence of the patron’s equity in any fund, capital investment or other assets of the association shall be signed by the president or a vice-president or treasurer or assistant treasurer and the secretary or an assistant secretary of the association, or by facsimiles of their signatures, and may be sealed with the seal of the association, or a facsimile thereof.

Certificates of membership of a nonstock association shall not be transferred without the consent of the association’s board of directors.

Voting stock in capital stock associations shall not be transferable to persons not eligible to membership in the association and such restrictions must be set forth in the bylaws of each capital stock association and printed on every stock certificate subject thereto.

The board of directors of an association, from time to time, may declare and the association may pay dividends on the stock or membership capital except when the declaration or payment thereof would be contrary to any restrictions contained in the articles of incorporation.

Net savings (which are hereby defined as being the excess of receipts over costs and expenses for each year of operations) in excess of dividends on outstanding stock or membership capital and additions to reserves shall be distributed on the basis of patronage, and the books of the association shall provide the basis for determining the interest of members and other patrons in the reserves. The distribution of patronage refunds may be restricted to members or be made at the same or a different rate for members and nonmembers. The bylaws may provide that any distribution to a nonmember, eligible for membership may be credited to such nonmember, until the amount thereof equals the value of a membership certificate or a share of the association’s voting stock.

After a member has notified the association of his withdrawal, or after the adoption of a resolution by the board terminating his membership, the board shall appraise the value in money of his membership interest in the association and shall determine and fix the time when the association shall pay him the value of his interest, unless the member, with the consent of the board, transfers his certificate of membership.

An association may issue nonvoting stock to members and nonmembers. Nonvoting stock may be redeemed or retired by the association on such terms and conditions as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws and printed on the stock certificates. Payment for nonvoting stock may be made in cash, services or property as determined by the board.Voting stock may be issued only for money or notes or in payment of patronage refunds at par.

Except when its debts exceed fifty per centum of its assets, an association may purchase for cash its voting stock at book value or par value, whichever is less, and may call such stock for redemption on the same basis pursuant to a plan for rotating ownership of such stock set forth in its articles of incorporation or in its bylaws. The determination of book value by the board of directors shall be incontestable except for fraud.

The association may from time to time issue to each patron a certificate or other evidence of the patron’s equity in any fund, capital investment or other assets of the association. Such certificate or other evidence of such equity may be transferred only to the association, or to such other purchaser as may be approved by the board of directors, upon such terms and conditions as shall be provided in the bylaws and printed thereon.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when there is held by any association any membership or patronage equity, including but not limited to membership stock, patronage refunds, patronage refund allocations, or any credit or distribution attributable to business done with or for patrons, to the credit of a person who has not had a current address on file with the association for a period of not less than three consecutive years, then the bylaws or member agreements of the association may provide that such equity shall be deemed to have been transferred by forfeiture to the association and shall thereafter be the property of the association; however, such membership or patronage equity shall be deemed forfeited to the association only if (i) the association publishes conspicuous notice of such pending forfeiture in its regular member publication, if any, and a publication of general circulation and (ii) such equity is not claimed by such person or, if such person is deceased, such person’s next of kin within 180 days of such publication or such longer period as set out in the bylaws or member agreements of the association. If there is no such provision in the association’s bylaws or member agreements, or if there is no publication, then any unclaimed membership or patronage equity shall be treated in accordance with the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.).

Any association organized with capital stock under this article may accept registrations of such stock in the names of two or more persons, payable to any one of them, or to any one of them or the survivor; and any person so named, whether the others be living or not, may accept dividend payments and withdraw from the association and receive the amount payable on withdrawal in the same manner and on the same terms as are allowed by law and the articles of incorporation and bylaws in case of any other member or stockholder and the receipt or acceptance of dividends or amounts payable on withdrawal by the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the association for any payment so made.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-269, 13-270, 13-273 to 13-277; 1952, c. 166; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 403; 1981, c. 51; 2001, cc. 797, 838.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 797 and 838, which added subsection J, in cl. 2 provide: “Any transfer by forfeiture of membership or patronage equity, including but not limited to membership stock, patronage refunds, patronage refund allocations, or any credit or distribution attributable to business done with or for patrons, which an association subject to this act has completed prior to July 1, 2001, shall be effective if such transfer was in compliance with the bylaws or member agreements of the association in effect at the time of such transfer, without regard to the publication requirements set forth in this act, and such transfer shall not be subject to the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§ 55-210.1 et seq.).”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted
“Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.)” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§ 55-210.1 et seq.).”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 797 and 838 are identical, and substituted the present designations A through I for the former designations (a) through (i); inserted present subsection J; and redesignated former subsection (j) as present subsection K.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 13.1-323.
General and special meetings; how called.

After the incorporation of an association the members thereof shall hold an organization meeting at a time and place fixed by the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation and shall adopt a set of bylaws.
Not less than ten days’ written notice thereof shall be given to each member. An association may provide in its bylaws for one or more regular meetings each year. Special meetings of the members may be called by the board of directors, and it shall be their duty to call such meetings when ten percent of the members file with the secretary a petition demanding a special meeting and specifying the business to be considered at such meeting.
Regular or special meetings may be held within or without the Commonwealth. Notice of all meetings, except as otherwise provided by law or the articles of incorporation or bylaws, shall be mailed to each member at least ten days prior to the meeting.
In the case of special meetings the notice shall state the purposes for which it is called.
The bylaws may provide that all notices shall be given by publication in a periodical published by or for the association, to which substantially all its members are subscribers, or in a newspaper or newspapers whose combined circulation is general in the territory in which the association operates.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-265; 1950, c. 238; 1956, c. 428; 1989, c. 577.

§ 13.1-324.
Directors generally; executive committee.

The business of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than five directors. The directors, with the exception of the public directors, shall be elected from the membership of the association or from the officers, directors or membership of a member association. The bylaws shall provide that one or more directors shall be appointed by the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Service. The director or directors so appointed shall be known as public directors. They need not be members of the association, or officers, directors or members of a member association, but shall have the same powers and rights as the directors elected by the members. A director shall hold office for the term for which he was appointed or elected and until his successor is elected, or appointed, and qualified.

The names of the first directors shall be stated in the articles of incorporation. Their successors shall be elected by the members at the first meeting of the members held after the incorporation of the association.

The number, qualifications, terms of office, manner of election or appointment, time and place of meeting and the powers and duties of the directors may, subject to the provisions of this Act and the articles of incorporation, be prescribed by the bylaws.

Except as otherwise prescribed in the bylaws, a director shall be elected or appointed for a term of one year.

Except as otherwise prescribed in the bylaws, vacancies in the board, other than by expiration of term, shall be filled by the remaining members of the board, unless the bylaws provide for the election of directors by districts, in which case the board shall call a special meeting of the members or delegates in the district to elect a person qualified to fill the vacancy. A director elected by the remaining members of the board shall serve until his successor is elected by the members at their next annual meeting or at any special meeting called and held prior thereto. This subsection shall not apply, however, to public directors; any vacancies occurring in the office of a public director shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected according to such districts, either directly or by district delegates elected by the members in that district. In such case, the bylaws shall specify, or vest in the board of directors authority to determine, the number of directors to be elected by each district and the manner and method of apportioning the directors and of districting and redistricting the territory covered by the association. The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held in each district to nominate the directors apportioned thereto and that the result of all such primary elections may be ratified by the next regular meeting of the association or may be considered as a final election.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee to be elected by the board of directors from their number and may allot to such committee all the functions and powers of the board subject to its general direction and control.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-266, 13-267; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-325.
Removal of director.

Any member may ask for the removal of an elected director by filing charges with the secretary or president of the association, together with a petition signed by ten per centum of the members requesting the removal of the director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next meeting of the members, and by two-thirds of the voting power voting thereon the association may remove the director. The director whose removal is requested shall be served with a copy of the charges not less than ten days prior to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person and by counsel and to present evidence; and the persons requesting the removal shall have the same opportunity. In case the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts, then the petition for removal of a director must be signed by twenty per centum of the members residing in the district from which he was elected. The board must call a special meeting of the members residing in the district to consider the removal of the director; and by two-thirds of the voting power of the members of that district voting thereon the director in question shall be removed from office.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-268; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-326.
Officers generally.

The board shall elect a president, a secretary and a treasurer, and may elect one or more vice-presidents, and such other officers as may be authorized in the bylaws. The president and at least one of the vice-presidents must be directors, but a vice-president who is not a director cannot succeed to or fill the office of president. Any two of the offices of vice-president, secretary and treasurer may be combined in one person.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-267; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-327.
Removal of officer.

Any member may bring charges of misconduct or incompetency against an officer by filing them with the secretary or president of the association, together with a petition signed by ten per centum of the members requesting the removal of the officer in question. The directors shall vote upon the removal of the officer at the first meeting of the board held after the hearing on the charges, and the officer may be removed by a majority vote, notwithstanding any contract the officer may have with the association, which shall terminate upon his removal anything in the contract to the contrary notwithstanding. The officer against whom such charges are made shall be served with a copy of the charges not less than ten days prior to the meeting, and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person and by counsel, and to present evidence, and the persons making the charges shall have the same opportunity.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-268; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-328.
Referendum.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that upon demand of two-fifths of all the directors, any matter that has been approved or passed by the board must be referred to the members for their approval before it becomes effective. No referendum shall be allowed unless it is demanded by the required number of directors at the meeting at which the matter in question is adopted. The referendum of the members may be conducted by mail ballots or by their vote taken at the next annual meeting or at a special meeting called for such purpose. Immediately upon receipt of a written petition signed by at least twenty per centum of the members, the board of directors shall require the secretary to conduct a referendum on the matter set forth in said petition.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-262; 1956, c. 428.